Washington statutes.
RCW 13.34.380

Visitation policies and protocols—Development—Elements.

The department shall develop consistent policies and protocols, based on current relevant research, concerning visitation for dependent children to be implemented consistently throughout the state. The department shall develop the policies and protocols in consultation with researchers in the field, community-based agencies, court-appointed special advocates, parents' representatives, and court representatives. The policies and protocols shall include, but not be limited to: The structure and quality of visitations; consultation with the assigned law enforcement officer in the event the parent or sibling of the child is identified as a suspect in an active criminal investigation for a violent crime that, if the allegations are true, would impact the safety of the child; and training for department caseworkers, visitation supervisors, and foster parents related to visitation.

The policies and protocols shall be consistent with the provisions of this chapter and implementation of the policies and protocols shall be consistent with relevant orders of the court.

[ 2018 c 284 s 29; 2013 c 254 s 3; 2009 c 520 s 45; 2004 c 146 s 3.]